Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1114
Tax credit; not refundable or transferable;
allocation; carry forward.

No
tax credit claimed under the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act shall be
refundable or transferable. Tax credits earned by a partnership, limited liability
company, subchapter S corporation, or other pass-through entity may be allocated
to the partners, members, or shareholders of such entity for their direct
use in accordance with any agreement among such partners, members, or shareholders.
Any amount of tax credit that the taxpayer is prohibited from claiming in
a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent
taxable years.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 14.